Utah statutes.
73-29-207.   Fences across public water.

(1)  The owner of a public access area adjacent to and lying beneath a public water may place a fence or obstruction across a public water for agricultural, livestock, or other lawful purposes.

(2)  A fence or other obstruction shall:

(a)  comply with an applicable federal, state, or local law; and

(b)  be constructed in a manner that does not create an unreasonably dangerous condition to the public lawfully using the public water.

(3)  The owner of a public access area shall allow the placement of a ladder, gate, or other facility allowing portage around a fence or obstruction if:

(a)  the owner places a fence or obstruction across a public water in accordance with Subsection (1); and

(b)  the water is open to public recreational access by permission or under Section 73-29-203.

